 ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS 

Our business, operations and financial results are subject to various risks and uncertainties, including those described below, that could adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows, and the trading price of our common stock. Many of the following risks and uncertainties are, and may continue to be, exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic. The following material factors, among others, could cause our actual results to differ materially from historical results and those expressed in forward-looking statements made by us or on our behalf in filings with the SEC, press releases, communications with investors and oral statements. 

Risk Factors Summary 

The following is a summary of the principal risks that could adversely affect our business, operations and financial results. 

Risks Related to Our Business 

&#8226; Adverse global economic conditions could have a negative effect on us. 

&#8226; We operate in the highly cyclical semiconductor industry. 

&#8226; The majority of our sales come from a small number of customers and a reduction in demand or loss of one or more of our significant customers may adversely affect our business. 

&#8226; Dependence on contract manufacturing and suppliers of critical components within our supply chain may adversely affect our ability to bring products to market. 

&#8226; We purchase a significant amount of the materials used in our products from a limited number of suppliers. 

&#8226; Our business is subject to various governmental regulations and trade restrictions. Compliance with these regulations may cause us to incur significant expense and, if we fail to maintain compliance, we may be forced to cease manufacture and distribution of certain products or subjected to administrative proceedings and civil or criminal penalties. 

&#8226; Global political and economic conditions and other factors related to our international operations could adversely affect us. 

&#8226; The COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted normal business activity. 

&#8226; We are subject to risks associated with our distributors and other channel partners, including product inventory levels and product sell-through. 

&#8226; Our dependence on senior management and if we are unable to attract and retain qualified personnel, we may not be able to execute our business strategy effectively. 

&#8226; The failure to complete or realize the expected benefits of our acquisition of VMware, Inc. (&#8220;VMware Merger&#8221;) may adversely affect our business and our stock price. 

&#8226; We may pursue acquisitions, investments, joint ventures and dispositions, which could adversely affect our results of operations. 

&#8226; We may be involved in legal proceedings, including IP, securities litigation, and employee-related claims. 

&#8226; Our operating results are subject to substantial quarterly and annual fluctuations. 

&#8226; Failure to adjust our manufacturing and supply chain to accurately meet customer demand could adversely affect our results of operations. 

&#8226; Winning business in the semiconductor solutions industry is subject to a lengthy process that often requires us to incur significant expense, from which we may ultimately generate no revenue. 

&#8226; Competition in our industries could prevent us from growing our revenue. 

&#8226; A prolonged disruption of our manufacturing facilities, research and development facilities, warehouses or other significant operations, or those of our suppliers, could have a material adverse effect on us. 

&#8226; We may be unable to maintain appropriate manufacturing capacity or product yields at our own manufacturing facilities. 

&#8226; An impairment of the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of our IT systems, or those of one or more of our corporate infrastructure vendors, could have a material adverse effect on our business. 

&#8226; Our ability to maintain or improve gross margin. 

&#8226; Our ability to protect the significant amount of IP in our business. 

&#8226; Incompatibility of our software products with operating environments, platforms, or third-party products, demand for our products and services could decrease. 

&#8226; Failure to enter into software license agreements on a satisfactory basis could adversely affect us. 

&#8226; Licensed third party software used in our products may not be available to us in the future, which may delay product development and production or cause us to incur additional expense. 

&#8226; Use of open source code sources, which, under certain circumstances could materially adversely affect us. 

&#8226; Failure of our software products to manage and secure IT infrastructures and environments could have a material adverse effect on our business. 

&#8226; We are subject to warranty claims, product recalls and product liability. 

&#8226; The complexity of our products could result in unforeseen delays or expense or undetected defects or bugs. 

&#8226; We make substantial investments in research and development and unsuccessful investments could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

&#8226; We collect, use, store, or otherwise process personal information, which subjects us to privacy and data security laws and contractual commitments, and our actual or perceived failure to comply with such laws and commitments could harm our business. 

&#8226; We are subject to environmental, health and safety laws, which could increase our costs, restrict our operations and require expenditures. 

&#8226; Social and environmental regulations, policies and provisions, as well as customer and investor demands, may make our supply chain more complex and may adversely affect our relationships with customers and investors. 

&#8226; The average selling prices of semiconductor products in our markets have often decreased rapidly and may do so in the future. 

&#8226; Fluctuations in foreign exchange rates could result in losses. 

Risks Relating to Taxes 

&#8226; Changes in tax legislation or policies could materially impact our financial position and results of operations. 

&#8226; Our corporate income taxes could significantly increase if we are unable to maintain our tax concessions or if our assumptions and interpretations regarding tax laws and concessions prove to be incorrect. 

&#8226; Our income taxes and overall cash tax costs are affected by a number of factors that could materially, adversely affect financial results. 

Risks Relating to Our Indebtedness 

&#8226; Our substantial indebtedness could adversely affect our financial health and our ability to execute our business strategy. 

&#8226; The instruments governing our indebtedness impose certain restrictions on our business. 

&#8226; Servicing our debt requires a significant amount of cash, and we may not have sufficient cash flows from our business to pay our substantial debt. 

Risks Relating to Owning Our Common Stock 

&#8226; Volatility of our stock price could result in substantial losses for our investors as well as class action litigation against us and our management. 

&#8226; The amount and frequency of our stock repurchases may fluctuate. 

&#8226; A substantial amount of our stock is held by a small number of large investors. 

&#8226; There can be no assurance that we will continue to declare cash dividends. 

For a more complete discussion of the material risks facing our business, see below. 

Risks Related to Our Business 

Adverse global economic conditions could have a negative effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition and liquidity. 

A general slowdown in the global economy, including a recession, or in a particular region or industry, an increase in trade tensions with U.S. trading partners, inflation or a tightening of the credit markets could negatively impact our business, financial condition and liquidity. Adverse global economic conditions have from time to time caused or exacerbated significant slowdowns in the industries and markets in which we operate, which have adversely affected our business and results of operations. Macroeconomic weakness and uncertainty also make it more difficult for us to accurately forecast revenue, gross margin and expenses, and may make it more difficult to raise or refinance debt. An escalation of trade tensions between the U.S. and China has resulted in trade restrictions and increased tariffs that harm our ability to participate in Chinese markets or compete effectively with Chinese companies. Sustained uncertainty about, or worsening of, current global economic conditions and further escalation of trade tensions between the U.S. and its trading partners, especially China, and possible 

decoupling of the U.S. and China economies, could result in a global economic slowdown and long-term changes to global trade. Such events may also (i) cause our customers and consumers to reduce, delay or forgo technology spending, (ii) result in customers sourcing products from other suppliers not subject to such restrictions or tariffs, (iii) lead to the insolvency or consolidation of key suppliers and customers, and (iv) intensify pricing pressures. Any or all of these factors could negatively affect demand for our products and our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

We operate in the highly cyclical semiconductor industry. 

The semiconductor industry is highly cyclical and is characterized by price erosion, wide fluctuations in product supply and demand, constant and rapid technological change, evolving technical standards, frequent new product introductions, and short product life cycles (for semiconductors and for many of the end products in which they are used). From time to time, these factors, together with changes in general economic conditions, cause significant upturns and downturns in the industry in general, and in our business in particular. The industry recently experienced a significant upturn due to the supply imbalance that resulted in record profitability and increases in average selling prices. It is possible that this recent industry up-cycle will be followed by a downturn, and historically, such down-cycles have been characterized by diminished demand for end-user products, high inventory levels and periods of inventory adjustment, under-utilization of manufacturing capacity, changes in revenue mix, accelerated erosion of average selling prices and elimination of expedite fees leading to reduced profitability and a decline in our stock price. The Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors for America Act could also result in an increase in supply leading to excess inventory and a decrease in average selling prices. We expect our business to continue to be subject to cyclical downturns even when overall economic conditions are relatively stable. If we cannot offset industry or market downturns, our net revenue may decline and our financial condition and results of operations may suffer. 

The majority of our sales come from a small number of customers and a reduction in demand or loss of one or more of our significant customers may adversely affect our business. 

We are dependent on a small number of end customers, OEMs, their respective contract manufacturers (&#8220;CMs&#8221;), and certain distributors for a majority of our business and revenue. For fiscal year 2022, sales to distributors accounted for 56% of our net revenue. We believe aggregate sales, through all channels, to Apple and our top five end customers, accounted for approximately 20% and 35% of our net revenue for fiscal year 2022, respectively. This customer concentration increases the risk of quarterly fluctuations in our operating results and our sensitivity to any material, adverse developments experienced by our significant customers. 

Our semiconductor customers are not generally required to purchase specific quantities of products. Even when customers agree to source an agreed portion of their product needs from us, such arrangements often include pricing schedules or methodologies that apply regardless of the volume of products purchased, and those customers may not purchase the amount of product we expect. As a result, we may not generate the amount of revenue or achieve the level of profitability we expect under such arrangements. Moreover, our top customers&#8217; purchasing power has, in some cases, given them the ability to make greater demands on us with regard to pricing and contractual terms in general. We expect this trend to continue, which may adversely affect our gross margin on certain products and, should we fail to perform under these arrangements, we could also be liable for significant monetary damages. 

The loss of, or any substantial reduction in sales to, any of our top customers could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. 

Dependence on contract manufacturing and suppliers of critical components within our supply chain may adversely affect our ability to bring products to market, damage our reputation and adversely affect our results of operations. 

We operate a primarily outsourced manufacturing business model that principally utilizes CMs, such as third-party wafer foundries and module assembly and test capabilities. Our semiconductor products require wafer manufacturers with state-of-the-art fabrication equipment and techniques, and most of our products are designed to be manufactured in a specific process, typically at one particular fab or foundry, either our own or with a particular CM. 

We depend on our CMs to allocate sufficient manufacturing capacity to meet our needs, to produce products of acceptable quality at acceptable yields, and to deliver those products to us on a timely basis. We do not generally have long-term capacity commitments with our CMs and substantially all of our manufacturing services are on a purchase order basis with no minimum quantities. Further, our CMs may fail to timely develop new, advanced manufacturing processes, including transitions to smaller geometry process technologies or, from time to time, will cease to, or will become unable to, manufacture a component for us. As lead times to identify, qualify and establish reliable production at acceptable yields with a new CM is typically lengthy, there is often no readily available alternative source and there may be other constraints on our ability to change CMs. In addition, qualifying new CMs is often expensive, and they may not produce products as cost-effectively as our current suppliers. 

TSMC, one of our CMs, manufactured approximately 90% of the wafers manufactured by our CMs during fiscal year 2022. We believe our wafer requirements represent a meaningful portion of TSMC&#8217;s total production capacity. However, TSMC also fabricates wafers for other companies, including some of our competitors, and could choose or be required to prioritize capacity for other customers or reduce or eliminate deliveries to us on short notice. In addition, TSMC has, and may in the future, raise their prices to us. 

If any of the foregoing circumstances occur, we may be unable to meet our customer demand, or to the same extent as our competitors, fail to meet our contractual obligations or forgo revenue opportunities. This has in the past damaged, and may in the future damage our relationships with our customers. This could also result in litigation for alleged failure to meet our obligations, payment of significant damages, and our net revenue could decline, adversely affecting our business, financial condition, results of operations and gross margin. 

Further, any substantial disruption in the contract manufacturing services that we utilize, including TSMC&#8217;s supply of wafers to us, as a result of a natural disaster, climate change, water shortages, political unrest, military conflicts, geopolitical turmoil, trade tensions, government orders, medical epidemics, such as the COVID-19 pandemic, economic instability, equipment failure or other cause, could materially harm our business, customer relationships and results of operations. 

We purchase a significant amount of the materials used in our products from a limited number of suppliers. 

Our manufacturing processes and those of our CMs rely on many materials, including silicon, GaAs and InP wafers, copper lead frames, precious and rare earth metals, mold compound, ceramic packages and various chemicals and gases. During fiscal year 2022, we purchased approximately two-thirds of our manufacturing materials from five materials providers, some of which are single source suppliers. As certain materials are highly specialized, the lead time needed to identify and qualify a new supplier is typically lengthy and there is often no readily available alternative source. We do not generally have long-term contracts with our materials providers and substantially all of our purchases are on a purchase order basis. Suppliers may extend lead times, limit supplies, place products on allocation or increase prices due to commodity price increases, capacity constraints, inflation, or other factors, any of which could lead to interruption of supply or increased demand in the industry. For example, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, we have experienced some supply constraints and increases in prices, including with respect to wafers and substrates. Additionally, the supply of these materials may be negatively impacted by increased trade tensions between the U.S. and its trading partners, particularly China. The supply constraints have had, and may continue to have, a negative impact on our customer relationships. Further, continued supply constraints for these or any other reasons could result in loss of revenue opportunities and adversely impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

Our business is subject to various governmental regulations, and compliance with these regulations may cause us to incur significant expense. If we fail to maintain compliance with applicable regulations, we may be forced to cease the manufacture and distribution of certain products, and we could be subject to administrative proceedings and civil or criminal penalties. 

Our business is subject to various domestic and international laws and other legal requirements, including anti-competition and import/export regulations, such as the U.S. Export Administration Regulations, and applicable executive orders. These laws, regulations and orders are complex, may change frequently and with limited notice, and have generally and may continue to become more stringent over time. We may be required to incur significant expense to comply with, or to remedy violations of, these regulations. In addition, if our customers fail to comply with these regulations, we may be required to suspend sales to these customers, which could damage our reputation and negatively impact our results of operations. The U.S. government may also add companies to its restricted entity list and/or technologies to its list of prohibited exports to specific countries, which have had and will continue to have an adverse effect on our ability to sell our products and our revenue. For example, Huawei Technologies Co., Ltd., one of our customers, is subject to certain U.S. export restrictions, which has required us to suspend sales to Huawei until we obtain licenses from the U.S. Department of Commerce. We may be unable to obtain or maintain the necessary licenses to allow us to export products to them. These restrictive governmental actions and any similar measures that may be imposed on U.S. companies by other governments, especially in light of ongoing trade tensions with China, will likely limit or prevent us from doing business with certain of our customers or suppliers and harm our ability to compete effectively or otherwise negatively affect our ability to sell our products, and adversely affect our business and results of operations. 

Our products and operations are also subject to regulation by U.S. and non-U.S. regulatory agencies, such as the FTC. From time to time, we may also be involved or required to participate in regulatory investigations or inquiries, such as the ongoing investigation by the Korean Fair Trade Commission into certain of our contracting and business practices, which may evolve into legal or other administrative proceedings. Growing public concern over concentration of economic power in corporations is likely to result in increased anti-competition legislation, regulation, administrative rule making, and enforcement activity. Involvement in regulatory investigations or inquiries, can be costly, lengthy, complex and time consuming, diverting the attention and energies of our management and technical personnel. 

If any pending or future governmental investigations result in an unfavorable resolution, we could be required to cease the manufacture and sale of the subject products or technology, pay fines or disgorge profits or other payments, and/or cease certain conduct and/or modify our contracting or business practices, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may be obligated to indemnify our current or former directors or employees, or former directors or employees of companies that we have acquired, in connection with regulatory investigations. These liabilities could be substantial and may include, among other things, the cost of government, law enforcement or regulatory investigations and civil or criminal fines and penalties. 

In addition, the manufacture and distribution of our semiconductors must comply with various laws and adapt to changes in regulatory requirements as they occur. For example, if a country in which our products are manufactured or sold sets technical standards that are not widely shared, it may require us to stop distributing our products commercially until they comply with such new standards, lead certain of our customers to suspend imports of their products into that country, require manufacturers in that country to manufacture products with different technical standards and disrupt cross-border manufacturing relationships, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we fail to comply with these requirements, we could also be required to pay civil penalties or face criminal prosecution. 

Global political and economic conditions and other factors related to our international operations could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

A majority of our products are produced, sourced and sold internationally and our international revenue represents a significant percentage of our overall revenue. In addition, as of October 30, 2022, nearly 49% of our employees were located outside the U.S. Multiple factors relating to our international operations and to particular countries in which we operate could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. These factors include: 

&#8226; changes in political, regulatory, legal or economic conditions or geopolitical turmoil (including China-Taiwan relations), including terrorism, war or political or military coups, state-sponsored or politically motivated cyber-attacks, or civil disturbances or political instability foreign and domestic; 

&#8226; restrictive governmental actions, such as restrictions on the transfer or repatriation of funds and foreign investments, data privacy regulations, imposition of climate change regulations, and trade protection measures, including increasing protectionism, import/export restrictions (including with regards to advanced technologies), import/export duties and quotas, trade sanctions and customs duties and tariffs, all of which have increased in recent years; 

&#8226; difficulty in obtaining product distribution and support, and transportation delays; 

&#8226; potential inability to localize software products; 

&#8226; difficulty in conducting due diligence with respect to business partners; 

&#8226; public health or safety concerns, medical epidemics or pandemics, such as COVID-19, and other natural- or man-made disasters; 

&#8226; nationalization of businesses and expropriation of assets; and 

&#8226; changes in U.S. and foreign tax laws. 

A significant legal risk associated with conducting business internationally is compliance with the various and differing laws and regulations of the many countries in which we do business. In addition, the laws in various countries are constantly evolving and may, in some cases, conflict with each other. Although our policies prohibit us, our employees and our agents from engaging in unethical business practices, there can be no assurance that all of our employees, distributors or other agents will refrain from acting in violation of our related anti-corruption or other policies and procedures. Any such violation could have a material adverse effect on our business. 

The COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted normal business activity, which has impacted how we operate our business. 

The COVID-19 pandemic and the efforts to control it disrupted, and reduced the efficiency of, normal business activities in much of the world. We experienced some disruption to parts of our global semiconductor supply chain, including procuring necessary components and inputs, such as wafers and substrates, in a timely fashion, with suppliers increasing lead times or placing products on allocation. As a result of these supply chain disruptions, we increased customer order lead times and placed some products on allocation. We are also largely building semiconductor products to order and this has limited and may continue to limit our ability to fulfill orders and satisfy all of the demand for our products. 

The pandemic resulted in authorities around the world implementing numerous unprecedented measures, such as travel restrictions quarantines, shelter-in-place order, and factory and office shutdowns, that impacted our workforce and 

operations, and those of our customers, CMs, suppliers and logistics providers. In addition, disruptions to commercial transportation infrastructure impacted delivery times for materials and components to our facilities, transfers of our products to our key suppliers and, in some cases, our ability to timely ship our products to customers. This resulted in significant logistical challenges and product delays, which could recur in the event of any future closures of, or periods of reduced operations at, our warehouse or the facilities of our suppliers and providers. 

In response to the pandemic, we have taken extensive measures to protect the health and safety of our employees and contractors at our facilities. However, existing or new precautionary measures or modifications in our business practices and policies, may negatively impact our business or operations, especially if the spread of COVID-19 (including any variants) worsens significantly. In addition, any actions we take may not be sufficient to mitigate the risk of infection and could result in a significant number of COVID-19-related claims. If a significant number of our employees, or employees and third parties performing key functions, including our Chief Executive Officer and members of our Board of Directors, become ill, our business may be further adversely impacted. In addition, changes to state workers&#8217; compensation laws, such as those in California, may increase our potential liability for such claims. See also our risk factor &#8220; If we are unable to attract and retain qualified personnel, especially our engineering and technical personnel, we may not be able to execute our business strategy effectively. &#8221; 

The degree to which the pandemic ultimately impacts our business and results of operations will depend on future developments beyond our control, including the extent of actions to contain the virus (including any variants), availability and efficacy of the vaccines or other treatments, public acceptance of the vaccines (including boosters), and to what extent normal economic and operating conditions resume. 

We are subject to risks associated with our distributors and other channel partners, including product inventory levels and product sell-through. 

We sell our products through a direct sales force and a select network of distributors and other channel partners globally. Sales to distributors accounted for 56% of our net revenue in the fiscal year ended October 30, 2022 and are subject to a number of risks, including: 

&#8226; fluctuations in demand based on our distributors&#8217; product inventory levels and end customer demand; 

&#8226; our distributors and other channel partners are generally not subject to minimum sales requirements or any obligation to market our products to their customers; 

&#8226; our distributors and other channel partners agreements are generally nonexclusive and may be terminated at any time without cause; 

&#8226; our lack of control over the timing of delivery of our products to end customers; and 

&#8226; our distributors and other channel partners may market and distribute competing products and may place greater emphasis on the sale of these products. 

In addition, we are selling our semiconductor products through an increasingly limited number of distributors, which exposes us to additional customer concentration and related credit risks. 

We do not always have a direct relationship with the end customers of our products. As a result, our semiconductor products may be used in applications for which they were not necessarily designed or tested, including, for example, medical devices, and they may not perform as anticipated in such applications. In such event, failure of even a small number of parts could result in significant liabilities to us, damage our reputation and harm our business and results of operations. 

Our business would be adversely affected by the departure of existing members of our senior management team. 

Our success depends, in large part, on the continued contributions of our senior management team, and in particular, the services of Hock E. Tan, our President and Chief Executive Officer. Effective succession planning is also important for our long-term success. Failure to ensure effective transfers of knowledge and smooth transitions involving senior management could hinder our strategic planning and execution. None of our senior management is bound by written employment contracts. In addition, we do not currently maintain key person life insurance covering our senior management. The loss of any of our senior management could harm our ability to implement our business strategy and respond to the rapidly changing market conditions in which we operate. 

If we are unable to attract and retain qualified personnel, especially our engineering and technical personnel, we may not be able to execute our business strategy effectively. 

Our future success depends on our ability to attract, retain and motivate qualified personnel. As the source of our technological and product innovations, our engineering and technical personnel (including cyber security experts) are a significant asset. Competition for these employees is significant in many areas of the world in which we operate, particularly 

in Silicon Valley and Southeast Asia where qualified engineers are in high demand. In addition, current or future immigration laws may make it more difficult to hire or retain qualified engineers, further limiting the pool of available talent. We believe equity awards provide a powerful long-term retention incentive and have historically granted these awards to the substantial majority of our employees. However, the amendments to our 2012 Stock Incentive Plan approved by our stockholders in 2021 significantly reduced the number of shares available for equity awards. As a result, we may need to change our current equity granting philosophy, which could impair our efforts to attract and retain necessary personnel. Any inability to retain, attract or motivate such personnel and provide competitive employment benefits could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

The failure to complete our acquisition of VMware, Inc. may adversely affect our business and our stock price. 

Consummation of the VMware Merger is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of customary closing conditions, including (i) the expiration or termination of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvement Act of 1976 and clearance under the antitrust laws of the European Union and certain other jurisdictions, (ii) the receipt by VMware of a tax opinion regarding the U.S. federal income tax treatment of certain aspects of the VMware Merger, (iii) the absence of certain orders or laws preventing consummation of the VMware Merger, (iv) authorization for listing additional shares of Broadcom common stock on Nasdaq, and (v) the absence of a material adverse effect with respect to either us or VMware. There can be no assurance that these or other closing conditions will be satisfied in a timely manner or at all. Any delay in completing the acquisition could cause us not to realize some or all of the anticipated benefits when expected, if at all. If the VMware Merger is not completed, our stock price could decline to the extent it reflects an assumption that we will complete the acquisition. Furthermore, if the VMware Merger is not completed, we may suffer other consequences that could adversely affect our business, results of operations and stock price, including incurring significant acquisition costs that we would be unable to recover, negative publicity and a negative impression of us in the investment community. Additionally, under certain specified circumstances, including the termination by either us or VMware because certain required regulatory clearances are not obtained, upon termination we would be required to pay VMware a termination fee of $1.5 billion. 

Failure to realize the benefits expected from the VMware Merger could adversely affect the value of our common stock. 

Although we expect significant benefits to result from the VMware Merger, there can be no assurance that we will actually realize any of them, or realize them within the anticipated timeframe. Achieving these benefits will depend, in part, on our ability to integrate VMware's business successfully and efficiently. The challenges involved in this integration, which will be complex and time consuming, include the following: 

&#8226; preserving customer and other important relationships of VMware and attracting new business and operational relationships; 

&#8226; integrating financial forecasting and controls, procedures and reporting cycles; 

&#8226; consolidating and integrating corporate, information technology, finance and administrative infrastructures; 

&#8226; coordinating sales and marketing efforts to effectively position our capabilities; 

&#8226; coordinating and integrating operations in countries in which we have not previously operated; and 

&#8226; integrating employees and related HR systems and benefits, maintaining employee morale and retaining key employees. 

If we do not successfully manage these issues and the other challenges inherent in integrating an acquired business, then we may not achieve the anticipated benefits of the VMware Merger on our anticipated timeframe or at all and our revenue, expenses, operating results, financial condition and stock price could be materially adversely affected. The successful integration of the VMware business will require significant management attention both before and after the completion of the VMware Merger, and may divert the attention of management from our business and operational issues. 

We may pursue acquisitions, investments, joint ventures and dispositions, which could adversely affect our results of operations. 

Our growth strategy includes acquiring or investing in businesses that offer complementary products, services and technologies, or enhance our market coverage or technological capabilities. 

Any acquisitions we may undertake, including the VMware Merger, and their integration involve risks and uncertainties, such as: 

&#8226; unexpected delays, challenges and related expenses, and disruption of our business; 

&#8226; diversion of management&#8217;s attention from daily operations and the pursuit of other opportunities; 

&#8226; incurring significant restructuring charges and amortization expense, assuming liabilities (some of which may be unexpected) and ongoing or new lawsuits, potential impairment of acquired goodwill and other intangible assets, and increasing our expenses and working capital requirements; 

&#8226; the potential for deficiencies in internal controls at the acquired business, as well as implementing our own management information systems, operating systems and internal controls for the acquired operations; 

&#8226; our due diligence process may fail to identify significant issues with the acquired business&#8217; products, financial disclosures, accounting practices, legal, tax and other contingencies, compliance with local laws and regulations (and interpretations thereof) in the U.S. and multiple international jurisdictions; 

&#8226; additional acquisition-related debt, which could increase our leverage and potentially negatively affect our credit ratings resulting in more restrictive borrowing terms or increased borrowing costs thereby limiting our ability to borrow; 

&#8226; dilution of stock ownership of existing stockholders; 

&#8226; difficulties integrating the acquired business or company and in managing and retaining acquired employees, vendors and customers; and 

&#8226; inaccuracies in our original estimates and assumptions used to assess a transaction, which may result in us not realizing the expected financial or strategic benefits of any such transaction. 

In addition, current and future changes to the U.S. and foreign regulatory approval process and requirements related to acquisitions, including the VMware Merger, may cause approvals to take longer than anticipated, not be forthcoming or contain burdensome conditions, which may prevent the transaction or jeopardize, delay or reduce the anticipated benefits of the transaction, and impede the execution of our business strategy. 

From time to time, we may also seek to divest or wind down portions of our business, either acquired or otherwise, or we may exit minority investments, any of which could materially affect our cash flows and results of operations. Such dispositions involve risks and uncertainties, including our ability to sell such businesses on terms acceptable to us, or at all, disruption to other parts of our business, potential loss of employees or customers, or exposure to unanticipated liabilities or ongoing obligations to us following any such dispositions. In addition, dispositions may include the transfer of technology and/or the licensing of certain IP rights to third-party purchasers, which could limit our ability to utilize such IP rights or assert these rights against such third-party purchasers or other third parties. 

We may be involved in legal proceedings, including IP, securities litigation, and employee-related claims, which could, among other things, divert efforts of management and result in significant expense and loss of our IP rights. 

We are often involved in legal proceedings, including cases involving our IP rights and those of others, commercial matters, acquisition-related suits, securities class action suits, employee-related claims and other actions. Litigation or settlement of such actions, regardless of their merit, can be costly, lengthy, complex and time consuming, diverting the attention and energies of our management and technical personnel. 

The industries in which we operate are characterized by companies holding large numbers of patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade secrets and by the vigorous pursuit, protection and enforcement of IP rights, including actions by patent-holding companies that do not make or sell products. From time to time, third parties assert against us and our customers and distributors their IP rights to technologies that are important to our business. For example, in August 2020 judgment was entered against Broadcom and Apple for infringement of certain patents and California Institute of Technology was awarded past damages of $270.2 million from Broadcom and $837.8 million from Apple, for which Apple is seeking indemnification from Broadcom. Although the appellate court recently vacated these damages and ordered a new trial, there are no assurances that we will be successful or what, if any, damages we will be required to pay. 

Many of our customer agreements, and in some cases our asset sale agreements, and/or the laws of certain jurisdictions may require us to indemnify our customers or purchasers for third-party IP infringement claims, including costs to defend those claims, and payment of damages in the case of adverse rulings. However, our CMs and suppliers may or may not be required to indemnify us should we or our customers be subject to such third-party claims. Claims of this sort could also harm our relationships with our customers and might deter future customers from doing business with us. If any pending or future proceedings result in an adverse outcome, we could be required to: 

&#8226; cease the manufacture, use or sale of the infringing products, processes or technology and/or make changes to our processes or products; 

&#8226; pay substantial damages for past, present and future use of the infringing technology, including up to treble damages if willful infringement is found; 

&#8226; expend significant resources to develop non-infringing technology; 

&#8226; license technology from the third-party claiming infringement, which license may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all; 

&#8226; enter into cross-licenses with our competitors, which could weaken our overall IP portfolio and our ability to compete in particular product categories; 

&#8226; pay substantial damages to our direct or end customers to discontinue use or replace infringing technology with non-infringing technology; or 

&#8226; relinquish IP rights associated with one or more of our patent claims. 

Any of the foregoing results could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

In addition, we may be obligated to indemnify our current or former directors or employees, or former directors or employees of companies that we have acquired, in connection with such litigation. These liabilities could be substantial and may include, among other things, the cost of defending lawsuits against these individuals, as well as stockholder derivative suits; civil or criminal fines and penalties; legal and other expenses; and expenses associated with the remedial measure, if any, which may be imposed. 

Our operating results are subject to substantial quarterly and annual fluctuations. 

Our operating results have fluctuated in the past and are likely to fluctuate in the future. These fluctuations may occur on a quarterly and annual basis and are due to a number of factors, many of which are beyond our control. In addition to many of the risks described elsewhere in this &#8220;Risk Factors&#8221; section, these factors include, among others: 

&#8226; the timing of launches by our customers of new product in which our products are included and changes in end-user demand for our customers&#8217; the products; 

&#8226; fluctuations in the levels of component or product inventories held by our customers; 

&#8226; the shift to cloud-based IT solutions and services, such as hyperscale computing, which may adversely affect the timing and volume of sales of our products for use in traditional enterprise data centers; 

&#8226; the timing of new software contracts and renewals, as well as the timing of any terminations of software contracts that require us to refund to customers any pre-paid amounts under the contract; 

&#8226; our ability to timely develop, introduce and market new products and technologies; 

&#8226; the timing and extent of our software license and subscription revenue, and other non-product revenue; 

&#8226; new product announcements and introductions by us or our competitors; 

&#8226; seasonality or other fluctuations in demand in our markets; 

&#8226; timing and amount of research and development and related new product expenditures, and the timing of receipt of any research and development grant monies; and 

&#8226; timing of any regulatory changes, particularly with respect to trade sanctions and customs duties and tariffs, and tax reform. 

The foregoing factors are often difficult to predict, and these, as well as other factors, could materially adversely affect our quarterly or annual operating results. In addition, a significant amount of our operating expenses are relatively fixed in nature. Any failure to adjust spending quickly enough to compensate for a revenue shortfall could magnify the adverse impact of such revenue shortfall on our results of operations. As a result, we believe that quarter-to-quarter comparisons of our revenue and operating results may not be meaningful or a reliable indicator of our future performance. If our operating results in one or more future quarters fail to meet the expectations of securities analysts or investors, a significant decline in the trading price of our common stock may occur, which may happen immediately or over time. 

Failure to adjust our manufacturing and supply chain to accurately meet customer demand could adversely affect our results of operations. 

We make significant decisions, including determining the levels of business that we will seek and accept, production schedules, levels of reliance on contract manufacturing and outsourcing, internal fabrication utilization and other resource requirements, based on our estimates of customer requirements, which may not be accurate. 

During the COVID-19 pandemic, we have moved largely to a build to order model and have extended customer lead times substantially in light of supply chain challenges. More typically, however, to ensure the availability of our semiconductor products we start manufacturing based on customer forecasts, which are not binding. As a result, we incur inventory and manufacturing costs in advance of anticipated sales that may be substantially lower than expected. If actual demand for our products is lower than forecast, we may also experience higher inventory carrying and operating costs and product obsolescence. Because certain of our sales, research and development, and internal manufacturing overhead expenses are relatively fixed, a reduction in customer demand may also decrease our gross margin and operating income. 

Conversely, customers often require rapid increases in production on short notice. If we are unable to meet such increases in demand, this could damage our customer relationships, reduce revenue growth and margins, subject us to additional liabilities, harm our reputation, and prevent us from taking advantage of opportunities. 

Winning business in the semiconductor solutions industry is subject to a lengthy process that often requires us to incur significant expense, from which we may ultimately generate no revenue. 

Our semiconductor business is dependent on us winning competitive bid selection processes, known as &#8220;design wins&#8221;. These selection processes are typically lengthy and can require us to dedicate significant development expenditures and scarce engineering resources in pursuit of a single customer opportunity. Failure to obtain a particular design win may prevent us from obtaining design wins in subsequent generations of a particular product. This can result in lost revenue and can weaken our position in future selection processes. 

Winning a product design does not guarantee sales to a customer. A delay or cancellation of a customer&#8217;s plans could materially and adversely affect our financial results, as we incur significant expense in the design process and may generate little or no revenue from it. In addition, the timing of design wins is unpredictable and implementing production for a major design win, or multiple design wins at the same time, may strain our resources and those of our CMs. In such event, we may be forced to dedicate significant additional resources and incur additional costs and expenses. Further, often customers will only purchase limited numbers of evaluation units until they qualify the products and/or the manufacturing line for those products. The qualification process can take significant time and resources. Delays in qualification or failure to qualify our products may cause a customer to discontinue use of our products and result in a significant loss of revenue. Finally, customers could choose at any time to stop using our products or could fail to successfully market and sell their products, which could reduce demand for our products, and cause us to hold excess inventory, materially adversely affecting our business, financial condition and results of operations. These risks are exacerbated by the fact that many of our products, and the end products into which our products are incorporated, often have very short life cycles. 

Competition in our industries could prevent us from growing our revenue. 

The industries in which we operate are highly competitive and characterized by rapid technological changes, evolving industry standards, changes in customer requirements, often aggressive pricing practices and, in some cases, new delivery methods. We expect competition in these industries to continue to increase as existing competitors improve or expand their product offerings or as new competitors enter our markets. 

Some of our competitors have longer operating histories, greater name recognition, a larger installed customer base, larger technical staffs, more established relationships with vendors or suppliers, or greater manufacturing, distribution, financial, research and development, technical and marketing resources than us. We also face competition from numerous smaller companies that specialize in specific aspects of the highly fragmented software industry, open source authors who provide software and IP for free, competitors who offer their products through try-and-buy or freemium models, and customers who develop competing products. 

In addition, the trend toward consolidation is changing the competitive landscape. We expect this trend to continue, which may result in combined competitors having greater resources than us. Some of our competitors may also receive financial and other support from their home country government or may have a greater presence in key markets, a larger customer base, a more comprehensive IP portfolio or better patent protection than us. 

The actions of our competitors, in the areas of pricing and product bundling in particular, could have a substantial adverse impact on us. Further, competitors may leverage their superior market position, as well as IP or other proprietary information, including interface, interoperability or technical information, in new and emerging technologies and platforms that may inhibit our ability to compete effectively. If we are unable to compete successfully, we may lose market share for our products or incur significant reduction in our gross margins, either of which could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. 

A prolonged disruption of our manufacturing facilities, research and development facilities, warehouses or other significant operations, or those of our suppliers, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

Although we operate a primarily outsourced manufacturing business model, we also rely on our own manufacturing facilities, in particular in Fort Collins, Colorado, Singapore, and Breinigsville, Pennsylvania. We use these internal fabrication facilities for products utilizing our innovative and proprietary processes. Our Fort Collins and Breinigsville facilities are the sole sources for the FBAR components used in many of our wireless devices and for the indium phosphide-based wafers used in our fibre optics products, respectively. Many of our facilities, and those of our CMs and suppliers, are located in California and the Pacific Rim region, which have above average seismic activity and severe weather activity. In addition, a significant majority of our research and development personnel are located the Czech Republic, India, Israel and the U.S., with the expertise of the personnel at each such location tending to be focused on one or two specific areas, and our primary warehouse is in Malaysia. 

A prolonged disruption at or shut-down of one or more of our manufacturing facilities or warehouses, especially our Colorado, Singapore, Malaysia and Pennsylvania facilities, or those of our CMs or suppliers, due to natural- or man-made disasters or other events outside of our control, such as equipment malfunction or widespread outbreaks of acute illness, including COVID-19, or for any other reason, would limit our capacity to meet customer demands and delay new product development until a replacement facility and equipment, if necessary, were found. To date, we have not experienced a material event, however such event could disrupt our operations, delay production, shipments and revenue, result in us being unable to timely satisfy customer demand, expose us to claims by our customers, result in significant expense to repair or replace our affected facilities, and, in some instances, could significantly curtail our research and development efforts in a particular product area or target market. As a result, we could forgo revenue opportunities, potentially lose market share, damage our customer relationships and be subject to litigation and additional liabilities, all of which could materially and adversely affect our business. Although we purchase insurance to mitigate certain losses, such insurance often carries a high deductible amount and any uninsured losses could negatively affect our operating results. In addition, even if we were able to promptly resume production of our affected products, if our customers cannot timely resume their own manufacturing following such an event, they may cancel or scale back their orders from us and this may in turn adversely affect our results of operations. Such events could also result in increased fixed costs relative to the revenue we generate and adversely affect our results of operations. 

We may be unable to maintain appropriate manufacturing capacity or product yields at our own manufacturing facilities, which could adversely affect our relationships with our customers, and our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

We must maintain appropriate capacity and product yields at our own manufacturing facilities to meet anticipated customer demand. From time to time, this requires us to invest in expansion or improvements of those facilities, which often involves substantial cost and other risks. Such expanded manufacturing capacity may still be insufficient, or may not come online soon enough, to meet customer demand and we may have to put customers on product allocation, forgo sales or lose customers as a result. Conversely, if we overestimate customer demand, we would experience excess capacity and fixed costs at these facilities will not be fully absorbed, all of which could adversely affect our results of operations. Similarly, reduced product yields, due to design or manufacturing issues or otherwise, may involve significant time and cost to remedy and cause delays in our ability to supply product to our customers, all of which could cause us to forgo sales, incur liabilities or lose customers, and harm our results of operations. 

An impairment of the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of our IT systems, or those of one or more of our corporate infrastructure vendors could have a material adverse effect on our business. 

Our business depends on various internally managed IT systems and outsourced IT services, including cloud-based and other critical corporate infrastructure services relating to, among other things, financial reporting, product orders and shipping, human resources, benefit plan administration, IT network development, network monitoring and electronic communication services, as well as third-party data centers. Any failure of these internal or third-party systems and services to operate effectively could disrupt our operations and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our operations are dependent upon our ability to protect our IT infrastructure against damage from business continuity events that could have a significant disruptive effect. Although these systems are designed to protect and secure our customers&#8217;, suppliers&#8217; and employees&#8217; confidential information, as well as our own proprietary information, we are, out of necessity, dependent on our vendors to adequately address cyber security threats to their own systems. In addition, software products we use (including technologies produced by us) have occasionally had in the past and may have in the future, vulnerabilities that, if left unmanaged, could reduce the overall level of security of the systems on which the software is installed. 

Cyber-attacks are increasing in number and sophistication, are well-financed, in some cases supported by state actors, and are designed to not only attack, but also to evade detection. Since the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access to systems, or to otherwise sabotage them, change frequently and are often not recognized until launched against a target, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate preventative measures. Geopolitical instability, such as Russia&#8217;s invasion of Ukraine, may increase the likelihood that we will experience direct or collateral consequences from cyber conflicts between nation-states or other politically motivated actors targeting critical technology infrastructure. Accidental or willful security breaches or other unauthorized access to our information systems or the systems of our service providers, or the existence of computer viruses or malware (such as ransomware) in our or their data or software could expose us to a risk of information loss, business disruption, and misappropriation of proprietary and confidential information, including information relating to our products or customers and the personal information of our employees or third parties. Such an event could disrupt our business and result in, among other things, unfavorable publicity, damage to our reputation, loss of our trade secrets and other competitive information, litigation by affected parties and possible financial obligations for liabilities and damages related to the theft or misuse of such information, significant remediation costs, disruption of key business operations and significant diversion of our resources, as well as fines and other sanctions resulting from any related breaches of data privacy regulations (such as the General Data Protection Regulation), any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, profitability and financial condition. While we may be entitled to damages if our vendors fail to perform under their agreements with us, any award may be insufficient to cover the actual costs incurred by us and, as a result of a vendor&#8217;s failure to perform, we may be unable to collect any damages. 

Despite our internal controls and investment in security measures, we have, from time to time, been subject to disruptive cyber-attacks or there have been attempts of unauthorized network intrusions and malware on our own IT networks. Although no such cyber security incidents have been material to Broadcom, we continue to devote resources to protect our systems and data from unauthorized access or misuse, and we may be required to expend greater resources in the future. 

U.S. and foreign regulators have also increased their focus on cyber security vulnerabilities and risks. Compliance with laws and regulations concerning privacy, cyber security, data governance, and data protection could result in significant expense, and any failure to comply could result in proceedings against us by regulatory authorities or other third parties. Further, customers and service providers increasingly demand rigorous contractual, certification and audit provisions regarding privacy, cyber security, data governance, data protection, confidentiality, and IP, which may also increase our overall compliance burden. 

Our gross margin is dependent on a number of factors, including our product mix, price erosion, acquisitions we may make, level of capacity utilization and commodity prices. 

Our gross margin is highly dependent on product mix, which is susceptible to seasonal and other fluctuations in our markets. A shift in sales mix away from our higher margin products, as well as the timing and amount of our software licensing and non-product revenue, could adversely affect our future gross margin percentages. In addition, increased competition and the existence of product alternatives, more complex engineering requirements, lower demand, industry oversupply or reductions in our technological lead compared to our competitors, and other factors have in the past and may in the future lead to further price erosion, lower revenue and lower margin. Conversely, periods of robust demand that create a supply imbalance, as we have seen recently, can lead to higher gross margins that may not be sustainable over the longer term. 

In addition, semiconductor manufacturing requires significant capital investment, leading to high fixed costs, including depreciation expense. If we are unable to utilize our owned manufacturing facilities at a high level, the fixed costs associated with these facilities will not be fully absorbed, resulting in higher average unit costs and a lower gross margin. Furthermore, we do not hedge our exposure to commodity prices, some of which are very volatile, and sudden or prolonged increases in commodities prices may adversely affect our gross margin. 

Our gross margin may also be adversely affected if businesses or companies that we acquire have different gross margin profiles and by expenses related to such acquisitions. 

We utilize a significant amount of IP in our business. If we are unable or fail to protect our IP, our business could be adversely affected. 

Our success depends in part upon protecting our IP. To accomplish this, we rely on a combination of IP rights, including patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade secrets, as well as customary contractual protections with our customers, suppliers, employees and consultants. We spend significant resources to monitor and protect our IP rights, including the unauthorized use of our products, usage rates of the software seat licenses and subscriptions that we sell, and even with significant expenditures, we may not be able to protect the IP rights that are valuable to our business. We are unable to predict or assure that: 

&#8226; our IP rights will not lapse or be invalidated, circumvented, challenged, or, in the case of third-party IP rights licensed to us, be licensed to others; 

&#8226; our IP rights will provide competitive advantages to us; 

&#8226; rights previously granted by third parties to IP licensed or assigned to us, including portfolio cross-licenses, will not hamper our ability to assert our IP rights or hinder the settlement of currently pending or future disputes; 

&#8226; any of our pending or future patent, trademark or copyright applications will be issued or have the coverage originally sought; 

&#8226; our IP rights will be enforced in certain jurisdictions where competition is intense or where legal protection may be weak; or 

&#8226; we have sufficient IP rights to protect our products or our business. 

Effective IP protection may be unavailable or more limited in other jurisdictions, relative to those protections available in the U.S., and may not be applied for or may be abandoned in one or more relevant jurisdictions. In addition, when patents expire, we lose the protection and competitive advantages they provided to us. 

We also generate revenue from licensing royalty payments and from technology claim settlements relating to certain of our IP. Licensing of our IP rights, particularly exclusive licenses, may limit our ability to assert those IP rights against third parties, including the licensee of those rights. In addition, we may acquire companies with IP that is subject to licensing obligations to other third parties. These licensing obligations may extend to our own IP following any such acquisition and may limit our ability to assert our IP rights. From time to time, we pursue litigation to assert our IP rights, including, in some cases, against our customers and suppliers. Claims of this sort could also harm our relationships with our customers and might deter future customers from doing business with us. Conversely, third parties have and may in the future pursue IP litigation against us, including as a result of our IP licensing business. An adverse decision in such types of legal action could limit our ability to assert our IP rights and limit the value of our technology, including the loss of opportunities to sell or license our technology to others or to collect royalty payments, which could otherwise negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

From time to time, we may need to obtain additional IP licenses or renew existing license agreements. We are unable to predict whether these license agreements can be obtained or renewed on acceptable terms or at all. 

If our software products do not remain compatible with ever-changing operating environments, platforms, or third-party products, demand for our products and services could decrease, which could materially adversely affect our business. 

We may be required to make substantial modification of our products to maintain compatibility with operating systems, systems software and computer hardware used by our customers or to provide our customers with desired features or capabilities. W e must also continually address the challenges of dynamic and accelerating market trends and competitive developments, such as the emergence of advanced persistent threats in the security space to compete effectively. There can be no assurance that we will be able to adapt our products in response to these developments. 

Further, our software solutions interact with a variety of software and hardware developed by third parties. If we lose access to third-party code and specifications for the development of code, this could negatively impact our ability to develop compatible software. In addition, if software providers and hardware manufacturers, including some of our largest vendors, adopt new policies restricting the use or availability of their code or technical documentation for their operating systems, applications, or hardware, or otherwise impose unfavorable terms and conditions for such access, this could result in higher research and development costs for the enhancement and modification of our existing products or development of new products. Any additional restrictions could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and operating results and cash flow. 

Failure to enter into software license agreements on a satisfactory basis could materially adversely affect our business. 

Many of our existing customers have multi-year enterprise software license agreements, some of which involve substantial aggregate fee amounts. Customer renewal rates may decline or fluctuate as a result of a number of factors, including the level of customer satisfaction with our solutions or customer support, customer budgets and the pricing of our solutions as compared with the solutions offered by our competitors, any of which may cause our revenue to grow more slowly than expected, if at all. The failure to renew customer agreements of similar scope, on terms that are commercially attractive to us, could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and operating results and cash flow. 

Certain software that we use in our products is licensed from third parties and may not be available to us in the future, which may delay product development and production or cause us to incur additional expense. 

Some of our solutions contain software licensed from third parties, some of which may not be available to us in the future on terms that are acceptable to us or allow our products to remain competitive. The loss of these licenses or the inability to 

maintain any of them on commercially acceptable terms could delay development of future products or the enhancement of existing products. 

Certain software we use is from open source code sources, which, under certain circumstances could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, operating results and cash flow. 

Some of our products contain software from open source code sources, the use of which may subject us to certain conditions, including the obligation to offer such products for no cost or to make the proprietary source code of those products publicly available. Further, although some open source vendors provide warranty and support agreements, it is common for such software to be available &#8220;as-is&#8221; with no warranty, indemnity or support. Although we monitor our use of such open source code to avoid subjecting our products to unintended conditions, such use, under certain circumstances, could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and operating results and cash flow, including if we are required to take remedial action that may divert resources away from our development efforts. 

Failure of our software products to manage and secure IT infrastructures and environments could have a material adverse effect on our business. 

Certain aspects of our software products are intended to manage and secure IT infrastructures and environments, and as a result, we expect these products to be ongoing targets of cyber security attacks. Open source code or other third-party software used in these products could also be targeted. Although we continually seek to improve our countermeasures to prevent such incidents, we may be unable to anticipate every scenario and it is possible that certain cyber threats or vulnerabilities will be undetected or unmitigated in time to prevent an attack or an accidental incident on us and our customers. Additionally, efforts by malicious cyber actors or others could cause interruptions, delays or cessation of our product licensing, or modification of our software, which could cause us to lose existing or potential customers. A successful cyber security attack involving our products could cause customers and potential customers to believe our services are ineffective or unreliable and result in, among other things, the loss of customers, unfavorable publicity, damage to our reputation, difficulty in marketing our products, allegations by our customers that we have not performed our contractual obligations and give rise to significant costs, including costs related to developing solutions or indemnification obligations under our agreements. Any such event could adversely impact our revenue and results of operations. See also &#8220; An impairment of the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of our IT systems, or those of one or more of our corporate infrastructure vendors, could have a material adverse effect on our business &#8221;. 

We are subject to warranty claims, product recalls and product liability. 

From time to time, we may be subject to warranty or product liability claims that may lead to significant expense. Our customer contracts typically contain warranty and indemnification provisions, and in certain cases may also contain liquidated damages provisions, relating to product quality issues. The potential liabilities associated with such provisions are significant, and in some cases, including in agreements with some of our largest customers, are potentially unlimited. Any such liabilities may greatly exceed any revenue we receive from the relevant products. Costs, payments or damages incurred or paid by us in connection with warranty and product liability claims and product recalls could materially adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. We may also be exposed to such claims as a result of any acquisition we may undertake in the future. 

Product liability insurance is subject to significant deductibles and there is no guarantee that such insurance will be available or adequate to protect against all such claims, or we may elect to self-insure with respect to certain matters. For example, it is possible for one of our customers to recall a product containing one of our semiconductor devices. In such an event, we may incur significant costs and expenses, including among others, replacement costs, contract damage claims from our customers and reputational harm. Although we maintain reserves for reasonably estimable liabilities and purchase product liability insurance, our reserves may be inadequate to cover the uninsured portion of such claims. Conversely, in some cases, amounts we reserve may ultimately exceed our actual liability for particular claims and may need to be reversed. 

The complexity of our products could result in unforeseen delays or expense or undetected defects or bugs, which could adversely affect the market acceptance of new products, damage our reputation with current or prospective customers, and materially and adversely affect our operating costs. 

Highly complex products, such as those we offer, may contain defects and bugs when they are first introduced or as new versions, software documentation or enhancements are released, or their release may be delayed due to unforeseen difficulties during product development. If any of our products or third-party components used in our products, contain defects or bugs, or have reliability, quality or compatibility problems, we may not be able to successfully design workarounds. Furthermore, if any of these problems are not discovered until after we have commenced commercial production or deployment of a new product, we may be required to incur additional development costs and product recall, repair or replacement costs. Significant technical challenges also arise with our software products because our customers license and deploy our products across a variety of computer platforms and integrate them with a number of third-party software 

applications and databases. As a result, if there is system-wide failure or an actual or perceived breach of information integrity, security or availability occurs in one of our end-user customer&#8217;s system, it can be difficult to determine which product is at fault and we could ultimately be harmed by the failure of another supplier&#8217;s product. Consequently, our reputation may be damaged and customers may be reluctant to buy our products, which could materially and adversely affect our ability to retain existing customers and attract new customers. To resolve these problems, we may have to invest significant capital and other resources and we would likely lose, or experience a delay in, market acceptance of the affected product or products. These problems may also result in claims against us by our customers or others. For example, if a delay in the manufacture and delivery of our products causes the delay of a customer&#8217;s end-product delivery, we may be required, under the terms of our agreement with that customer, to compensate the customer for the adverse effects of such delays. As a result, our financial results could be materially adversely affected. 

We make substantial investments in research and development and unsuccessful investments could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

The industries in which we compete are characterized by rapid technological change, changes in customer requirements, frequent new product introductions and enhancements, short product cycles and evolving industry standards, and new delivery methods. In addition, semiconductor products transition over time to increasingly smaller line width geometries and failure to successfully transition to smaller geometry process technologies could impair our competitive position. In order to remain competitive, we have made, and expect to continue to make, significant investments in research and development. If we fail to develop new and enhanced products and technologies, if we focus on technologies that do not become widely adopted, or if new competitive technologies that we do not support become widely accepted, demand for our products may be reduced. Increased investments in research and development or unsuccessful research and development efforts could cause our cost structure to fall out of alignment with demand for our products, which would have a negative impact on our financial results. 

We collect, use, store, or otherwise process personal information, which subjects us to privacy and data security laws and contractual commitments, and our actual or perceived failure to comply with such laws and commitments could harm our business. 

We collect, use and store (collectively, &#8220;process&#8221;) a high volume, variety and velocity of certain personal information in connection with the operation of our business. This creates various levels of privacy risks across different parts of our business, depending on the type of personal information, the jurisdiction in question and the purpose of their processing. The personal information we process is subject to an increasing number of federal, state, local, and foreign laws and regulations regarding privacy and data security, as well as contractual commitments. Privacy legislation and other data protection regulations, enforcement and policy activity in this area are expanding rapidly in many jurisdictions and creating a complex regulatory compliance environment. Sectoral legislation, certification requirements and technical standards applying to certain categories of our customers, such as those is the financial services or public sector, are likely to further exacerbate this trend. The cost of complying with and implementing these privacy-related and data governance measures could be significant as they may create additional burdensome security, business process, business record or data localization requirements. Concerns about government interference, sovereignty, expanding privacy, cyber security and data governance legislation could adversely affect our customers and our products and services, particularly in cloud computing, artificial intelligence and our own data management practices. The theft, loss or misuse of personal data collected, used, stored or transferred by us to run our business could result in significantly increased business and security costs or costs related to defending legal claims. Any inadvertent failure or perceived failure by us to comply with privacy, data governance or cyber security obligations may result in governmental enforcement actions, litigation, substantial fines and damages, and could cause our customers to lose trust in us, which could have an adverse effect on our reputation and business. 

We are subject to environmental, health and safety laws, which could increase our costs, restrict our operations and require expenditures that could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and financial condition. 

We are subject to a variety of domestic and international laws and regulations relating to the use, disposal, clean-up of and human exposure to hazardous materials. Compliance with environmental, health and safety requirements could, among other things, require us to modify our manufacturing processes, restrict our ability to expand our facilities, or require us to acquire pollution control equipment, all of which can be very costly. Any failure by us to comply with such requirements could result in the limitation or suspension of the manufacture of our products and could result in litigation against us and the payment of significant fines and damages by us in the event of a significant adverse judgment. In addition, complying with any cleanup or remediation obligations for which we are or become responsible could be costly and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

Changing requirements relating to the materials composition of our semiconductor products, including the restrictions on lead and certain other substances in electronic products sold in various countries, including the U.S., China and Japan, and in the European Union, increase the complexity and costs of our product design and procurement operations and may require us to re-engineer our products. Such re-engineering may result in excess inventory or other additional costs and could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. We may also experience claims from employees from time to time with regard to exposure to hazardous materials or other workplace related environmental claims. 

Social and environmental regulations, policies and provisions, as well as customer and investor demands, may make our supply chain more complex and may adversely affect our relationships with customers and investors. 

There is an increasing focus on corporate social and environmental responsibility in the semiconductor industry, particularly with OEMs that manufacture consumer electronics. A number of our customers have adopted, or may adopt, procurement policies that include social and environmental responsibility provisions or requirements that their suppliers should comply with, or they may seek to include such provisions or requirements in their procurement terms and conditions. An increasing number of investors are also requiring companies to disclose corporate social and environmental policies, practices and metrics. In addition, various jurisdictions are developing climate change-based laws or regulations that could cause us to incur additional direct costs for compliance, as well as indirect costs resulting from our customers, suppliers, or both incurring additional compliance costs that are passed on to us. These legal and regulatory requirements, as well as investor expectations, on corporate environmental and social responsibility practices and disclosure, are subject to change, can be unpredictable, and may be difficult and expensive for us to comply with, given the complexity of our supply chain and our significant outsourced manufacturing. If we are unable to comply, or are unable to cause our suppliers or CMs to comply, with such policies or provisions or meet the requirements of our customers and investors, a customer may stop purchasing products from us or an investor may sell their shares, and may take legal action against us, which could harm our reputation, revenue and results of operations. 

In addition, as part of their corporate social and environmental responsibility programs, an increasing number of OEMs are seeking to source products that do not contain minerals sourced from areas where proceeds from the sale of such minerals are likely to be used to fund armed conflicts, such as in the Democratic Republic of Congo. This could adversely affect the sourcing, availability and pricing of minerals used in the manufacture of semiconductor devices, including our products. As a result, we may face difficulties in satisfying these customers&#8217; demands, which may harm our sales and operating results. 

The average selling prices of semiconductor products in our markets have often decreased rapidly and may do so in the future, which could harm our revenue and gross profit. 

The semiconductor products we develop and sell are used for high volume applications. As a result, the prices of those products have often decreased rapidly. Gross profit on our products may be negatively affected by, among other things, pricing pressures from our customers. In the past, we have reduced the average selling prices of our products in anticipation of future competitive pricing pressures, new product introductions by us or our competitors and other factors. In addition, some of our customer agreements provide for volume-based pricing and product pricing roadmaps, which can also reduce the average selling prices of our products over time. Our margins and financial results will suffer if we are unable to offset any reductions in our average selling prices by increasing our sales volumes, reducing manufacturing costs, or developing new and higher value-added products on a timely basis. 

Fluctuations in foreign exchange rates could result in losses. 

We operate global businesses and our consolidated financial results are reported in U.S. dollars. However, some of the revenue and expenses of our foreign subsidiaries are denominated in local currencies. Fluctuations in foreign exchange rates against the U.S. dollar could result in substantial changes in reported revenues and operating results due to the foreign exchange impact of translating these transactions into U.S. dollars. 

In the normal course of business, we employ various hedging strategies to partially mitigate these risks, including the use of derivative instruments. These strategies may not be effective in protecting us against the effects of fluctuations in foreign exchange rates. As a result, fluctuations in foreign exchange rates could result in financial losses. 

Risks Related to Our Taxes 

Changes in tax legislation or policies could materially impact our financial position and results of operations. 

Corporate tax reform, anti-base-erosion rules and tax transparency continue to be high priorities in many jurisdictions. As a result, policies regarding corporate income and other taxes in numerous jurisdictions are under heightened scrutiny and tax reform legislation has been, and will likely continue to be, proposed or enacted in a number of jurisdictions in which we operate. 

After enactment of the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, most of our income is taxable in the U.S. with a significant portion taxable under the Global Intangible Low-Taxed Income (&#8220;GILTI&#8221;) regime. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, the deduction allowable under the GILTI regime will decrease from 50% to 37.5%, which will increase the effective tax rate imposed on our income. The U.S. also enacted the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (&#8220;IRA&#8221;) in August 2022, which creates a new book minimum tax of at least 15% of consolidated GAAP pre-tax income for corporations with average book income in excess of $1 billion. The book minimum tax will first apply to our fiscal year 2024 and any increase in our effective tax rate or cash tax will depend on a number of factors, including any offsets for foreign tax credits or general business credits, or changes in book income following business combinations. The IRA also creates an excise tax of 1% of the value of any stock repurchased by us after December 31, 2022. We could be subject to this new excise tax, but the amount will vary depending on various factors, including the amount and frequency of any stock repurchases, applicability in certain business combination transactions, and any permitted reductions or exceptions to the amount subject to the tax. If (i) the U.S. tax rate increases, (ii) the deduction allowable under the GILTI regime is further reduced or eliminated, (iii) additional limitations are put on our ability to deduct interest expense, or (iv) the requirement for research and development costs to be capitalized beginning in fiscal year 2023 remains in effect, our provision for income taxes, net income, and cash flows would be adversely impacted. 

In addition, many countries are implementing legislation and other guidance to align their international tax rules with the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development&#8217;s (&#8220;OECD&#8221;) Base Erosion and Profit Shifting recommendations and action plan that aim to standardize and modernize global corporate tax policy, including changes to cross-border tax, transfer pricing documentation rules, and nexus-based tax incentive practices. The OECD is also continuing discussions surrounding fundamental changes in allocation of profits among tax jurisdictions in which companies do business, as well as the implementation of a global minimum tax (namely the &#8220;Pillar One&#8221; and &#8220;Pillar Two&#8221; proposals). Some countries intend to implement laws based on Pillar Two proposals, which may adversely impact our provision for income taxes, net income and cash flows. As a result of this heightened scrutiny, prior decisions by tax authorities regarding treatments and positions of corporate income taxes could be subject to enforcement activities, and legislative investigation and inquiry, which could also result in changes in tax policies or prior tax rulings. Any such changes may also result in the taxes we previously paid being subject to change. 

Any substantial changes in domestic or international corporate tax policies, regulations or guidance, enforcement activities or legislative initiatives may materially adversely affect our business, the amount of taxes we are required to pay and our financial condition and results of operations generally. 

If the tax incentives or tax holiday arrangements we have negotiated change or cease to be in effect or applicable for any reason, or if our assumptions and interpretations regarding tax laws and incentives or holiday arrangements prove to be incorrect, our corporate income taxes could significantly increase. 

Our operations are currently structured to benefit from the various tax incentives extended to us in various jurisdictions to encourage investment or employment. For example, absent our principal tax incentives from the Singapore Economic Development Board, which is scheduled to expire in 2025, the corporate income tax rate that would apply to our Singapore taxable income would be 17%. We also have a tax holiday on our qualifying income in Malaysia, which is scheduled to expire in fiscal year 2028. Each tax incentive and tax holiday is subject to our compliance with various operating and other conditions and may, in some instances, be amended or terminated prior to their scheduled termination date by the relevant governmental authority. If we cannot, or elect not to, comply with the operating conditions included in any particular tax incentive or tax holiday, we could, in some instances, be required to refund previously realized material tax benefits, or if such tax incentive or tax holiday is terminated prior to its expiration absent a new incentive applying, we will lose the related tax benefits earlier than scheduled. In addition, we may be required, or elect, to modify our operational structure and tax strategy in order to keep an incentive, which could result in a decrease in the benefits of the incentive. Our tax incentives could also be adversely impacted if the global minimum tax provisions (Pillar Two) are adopted in a country in which we have an existing tax incentive. Our tax incentives and tax holiday, before taking into consideration U.S. foreign tax credits, decreased the provision for income taxes by approximately $ 1,821 million in the aggregate and increased diluted net income per share by $4.31 for fiscal year 2022. 

Our interpretations and conclusions regarding the tax incentives are not binding on any taxing authority, and if our assumptions about tax and other laws are incorrect or if these tax incentives are substantially modified or rescinded, we could suffer material adverse tax and other financial consequences, which would increase our expenses, reduce our profitability and adversely affect our cash flows. 

Our income taxes and overall cash tax costs are affected by a number of factors that could materially, adversely affect financial results. 

Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide income taxes. In the ordinary course of our business, there are many transactions where the ultimate tax determination is uncertain. Additionally, our calculations of income taxes payable currently and on a deferred basis are based on our interpretations of applicable tax laws in the jurisdictions in which 

we are required to file tax returns. Although we believe our tax estimates are reasonable, there is no assurance that the final determination of our income tax liability will not be materially different than what is reflected in our income tax provisions and accruals. 

Our income taxes are subject to volatility and could be adversely affected by numerous factors including: 

&#8226; reorganization or restructuring of our businesses, tangible and intangible assets, outstanding indebtedness and corporate structure; 

&#8226; jurisdictional mix of our income and assets; 

&#8226; changes in the allocation of income and expenses, including adjustments related to changes in our corporate structure, acquisitions or tax law; 

&#8226; changes in U.S and foreign tax laws and regulations, changes to the taxation of earnings of foreign subsidiaries, taxation of U.S. income generated from foreign sources, the deductibility of expenses attributable to income and foreign tax credit rules; 

&#8226; tax effects of increases in non-deductible employee compensation; and 

&#8226; changes in tax accounting rules or principles and in the valuation of deferred tax assets and liabilities. 

We have adopted transfer pricing policies that call for the provision of services, the sale of products, the arrangement of financing and the grant of licenses from one affiliate to another at prices that we believe are negotiated on an arm&#8217;s length basis. Our taxable income is dependent upon acceptance by local authorities that our operational practices and intercompany transfer pricing are on an arm&#8217;s length basis. Due to inconsistencies in application of the arm&#8217;s length standard among taxing authorities, as well as lack of comprehensive treaty-based protection, transfer pricing challenges by tax authorities could, if successful, result in adjustments for prior or future years. The effects of any such changes could subject us to higher taxes and our earnings, results of operations and cash flow would be adversely affected. 

In addition, we are subject to, and are under, tax audit in various jurisdictions, and such jurisdictions may assess additional income tax against us. Although we believe our tax positions are reasonable, the final determination of tax audits could be materially different from our income tax provisions and accruals. The ultimate result of an audit could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows in the period or periods for which that determination is made. 

Risks Related to Our Indebtedness 

Our substantial indebtedness could adversely affect our financial health and our ability to execute our business strategy. 

As of October 30, 2022, the aggregate indebtedness under our senior notes was $41,218 million. This amount does not reflect any debt we expect to incur or assume in connection with the VMware Merger. 

Our substantial indebtedness could have important consequences including: 

&#8226; increasing our vulnerability to adverse general economic and industry conditions; 

&#8226; exposing us to interest rate risk due to our variable rate term facilities, which we do not typically hedge against; 

&#8226; limiting our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in the economy and the semiconductor industry; 

&#8226; placing us at a competitive disadvantage compared to our competitors with less indebtedness; 

&#8226; making it more difficult to borrow additional funds in the future to fund growth, acquisitions, working capital, capital expenditures and other purposes; and 

&#8226; potentially requiring us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow from operations to payments on our indebtedness, thereby reducing the availability of our cash flow to fund our other business needs. 

We receive debt ratings from the major credit rating agencies in the U.S. Factors that may impact our credit ratings include debt levels, planned asset purchases or sales and near-term and long-term production growth opportunities. Liquidity, asset quality, cost structure, reserve mix and commodity pricing levels could also be considered by the rating agencies. While we are focused on maintaining investment grade ratings from these agencies, we may be unable to do so. Any downgrade in our credit rating or the ratings of our indebtedness, or adverse conditions in the debt capital markets, could: 

&#8226; adversely affect the trading price of, or market for, our debt securities; 

&#8226; increase interest expense under our term facilities; 

&#8226; increase the cost of, and adversely affect our ability to refinance, our existing debt; and 

&#8226; adversely affect our ability to raise additional debt. 

The instruments governing our indebtedness impose certain restrictions on our business. 

The instruments governing our indebtedness contain certain covenants imposing restrictions on our business. These restrictions may affect our ability to operate our business, to plan for, or react to, changes in the market conditions or our capital needs and may limit our ability to take advantage of potential business opportunities as they arise. The restrictions placed on us include maintenance of an interest coverage ratio and limitations on our ability to incur certain secured debt, enter into certain sale and lease-back transactions and consolidate, merge, sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of our assets. In addition, the instruments contain customary events of default upon the occurrence of which, after any applicable grace period, the indebtedness could be declared immediately due and payable. In such event, we may not have sufficient available cash to repay such debt at the time it becomes due, or be able to refinance such debt on acceptable terms or at all. Any of the foregoing could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. 

Servicing our debt requires a significant amount of cash, and we may not have sufficient cash flow from our business to pay our substantial debt. 

Our ability to make scheduled payments of the principal of, to pay interest on, and to refinance our debt, depends on our future performance, which is subject to economic, financial, competitive and other factors. Our business may not continue to generate cash flow from operations in the future sufficient to satisfy our obligations under our current indebtedness and any future indebtedness we may incur and to make necessary capital expenditures. If we are unable to generate such cash flow, we may be required to adopt one or more alternatives, such as reducing or delaying investments or capital expenditures, selling assets, refinancing or obtaining additional equity capital on terms that may be onerous or highly dilutive. Our ability to refinance our outstanding indebtedness or future indebtedness will depend on the capital markets and our financial condition at such time. We may not be able to engage in any of these activities or engage in these activities on desirable terms when needed, which could result in a default on our indebtedness. 

Risks Related to Owning Our Common Stock 

At times, our stock price has been volatile and it may fluctuate substantially in the future, which could result in substantial losses for our investors as well as class action litigation against us and our management which could cause us to incur substantial costs and divert our management&#8217;s attention and resources. 

The trading price of our common stock has, at times, fluctuated significantly and could be subject to wide fluctuations in response to any of the risk factors listed in this &#8220;Risk Factors&#8221; section, and others, including: 

&#8226; issuance of new or updated research or other reports by securities analysts; 

&#8226; fluctuations in the valuation and results of operations of our significant customers as well as companies perceived by investors to be comparable to us; 

&#8226; announcements of proposed acquisitions by us or our competitors; 

&#8226; announcements of, or expectations of, additional debt or equity financing transactions; 

&#8226; stock price and volume fluctuations attributable to inconsistent trading volume levels of our common stock; 

&#8226; hedging or arbitrage trading activity involving our common stock; and 

&#8226; unsubstantiated news reports or other inaccurate publicity regarding us or our business. 

These fluctuations are often unrelated or disproportionate to our operating performance. Broad market and industry fluctuations, as well as general economic, political and market conditions such as recessions, interest rate changes or currency fluctuations, may negatively impact the market price of our common stock. You may not realize any return on your investment in us and may lose some or all of your investment. In the past, companies that have experienced volatility in the market price of their stock have been subject to securities class action litigation. We may be the target of this type of litigation in the future. In addition, we have been, and in the future we may be, subject to lawsuits stemming from our acquisitions, including the VMware Merger. Securities litigation against us, including the lawsuits related to such acquisitions, could result in substantial costs and divert our management&#8217;s attention from other business concerns, which could seriously harm our business. 

The amount and frequency of our stock repurchases may fluctuate. 

The amount, timing and execution of our stock repurchase program may fluctuate based on our priorities for the use of cash for other purposes. These purposes include operational spending, capital spending, acquisitions, repayment of debt and returning cash to our stockholders as dividend payments. Changes in cash flows, tax laws and our stock price could also impact our stock repurchase program. We are not obligated to repurchase any specific amount of shares of common stock, and the stock repurchase program may be suspended or terminated at any time. 

A substantial amount of our stock is held by a small number of large investors and significant sales of our common stock by one or more of these holders could cause our stock price to fall. 

As of September 30, 2022, we believe 10 of our 20 largest holders of common stock were active institutional investors who held approximately 27% of our outstanding shares of common stock in the aggregate. These investors may sell their shares at any time for a variety of reasons and such sales could depress the market price of our common stock. In addition, any such sales of our common stock by these entities could also impair our ability to raise capital through the sale of additional equity securities. 

There can be no assurance that we will continue to declare cash dividends. 

Our Board of Directors has adopted a dividend policy pursuant to which we currently pay a cash dividend on our common stock on a quarterly basis. The declaration and payment of any dividend is subject to the approval of our Board of Directors and our dividend may be discontinued or reduced at any time. Because we are a holding company, our ability to pay cash dividends is also limited by restrictions or limitations on our ability to obtain sufficient funds through dividends from subsidiaries. There can be no assurance that we will declare cash dividends in the future in any particular amounts, or at all. 

